src/morphology/affixes/verbs-L2.lexc
LEXICON OT-PASSIVE_GILVI
! The first two entries from DOHPPE
! CIRROStem ; !replaced to avoid passive + actio
! +Der4+Der/muš+N+Use/-Spell:mušš@C.NeedNoun@ MUSH ; !L2
! +Der1+Der/meahttun+Err/Orth+Use/-Spell:»X7#meahttu MEAHTTUN ; !L2
 :j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJ ;
! DOHPPEINCH ; !replaced to avoid passive + actio
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj ; ! Der/goah0ti changed to Der/goahti, as 0 is bad in tag
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:šgoah'ti%> BOAHTICnj ; ! ditto
 :j jStemsDOHPPE ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>Y5 VSufDOHPPE ;
 +Cond:%>Y5 CondV2 ;
 +Pot+Prs:%>Y5ž PotC ;
 +Imprt:%>Y5 ImprtSg2 ; !Prs
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»Y5me K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess+Use/NG:»Y5min K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»Y5men K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom:»Y5n R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom:»Y5n K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»Y5n K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgGen:»Y5ma R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc:»Y5mis K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com:»Y5mijn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:»Y5mijnna K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill:»Y5mij K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc:»Y5ma K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom:»Y5mat K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:»Y5mak K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom:»Y5mijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen:»Y5mijd K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/PlGen:»Y5mijd R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Acc:»Y5mijd K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ill:»Y5mijdda K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc:»Y5mijn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:»Y5mijnna K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»Y5mijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com:»Y5mijgujn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»Y5mij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen:»Y5mijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Acc:»Y5mijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ill:»Y5mijddás%> PxC ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc:»Y5mijnni%> PxV ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com:»Y5mijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 :%>Y5 NominalFormsV2 ;
 :%>Y5 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +Inf:%>Y5t K ;
 +Actio+Nom:%>Y5n K ;
 +Actio+Gen:%>Y5n K ; ! ! (Re?)introducing?
 +Actio+Ess:%>Y5me K ;
 +Actio+Ess:%>Y5min K ;
 +Actio+Ess:%>Y5men K ;
 +Actio+Loc:%>Y5mis K ;
 +Actio+Com:%>Y5mijn K ;
 :Y6 VjStemsDOHPPE ;
! The entry leading to PASSIVE in DOHPPE is omitted here.
! The next entries are the non-passive partS of the DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE entry.
 +Der1+Der/st+V:st BASSO-MUITAL ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:stalla%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:stadda%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:stas'ti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:steas'ti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+TV:h BASSO-MUITAL ;
! +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:halla%> BOAHTIStem ;
! +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:hadda%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:has'ti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:heas'ti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/d+V:d BASSO-MUITAL ;

LEXICON GILLE_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__  Contracted Verbs without Personal Passive
 +V+IV:%> CIRROStem ;
 +V+IV:»j SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsGILLE ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;


LEXICON CIRRO_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__  Inchoatives and essives on -á, -o, -e without Personal Passive - no actiocmps
 +V+IV:%> CIRROStem ;
 +V+IV:»j SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsGILLE ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;



LEXICON DOHPPE_TV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Contracted Verbs with Personal Passive
 +V+TV:%> DOHPPEStem ;
 +V+TV:»j PASSIVE ;
! +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:»supmái K ; !just for evenstems
 +V+TV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE ;
 +V+TV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;

LEXICON GARRE_TV  !!= * __@CODE@__  Contracted Verbs with Personal Passive   for speller to hinder garrenávnnas, garrenoaivi etc
 +V+TV:%> GARREStem ;
 +V+TV:»j PASSIVE ;
! +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:»supmái K ; !just for evenstems
 +V+TV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE ;
 +V+TV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;

LEXICON ORRO_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__  for speller to hinder orronsadji etc
 +V+IV:%> ORROStem ;
 +V+IV:»j SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsGILLE ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;


LEXICON MUITA_TV  !!= * __@CODE@__  Inchoatives and essives on -á, -o, -e with Personal Passive  - no actiocmps
 +V+TV:%> CIRROStemTV ;
 +V+TV:»j PASSIVE ;
! +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:»supmái K ; !just for evenstems
 +V+TV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE ;
 +V+TV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;



LEXICON MAHTA_TV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Contracted Verbs without Personal Passive but with Acc obj.
 +V+TV:»j SG3PASS ;
 +V+TV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsGILLE ;
 +V+TV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;
! This lexicon goes as GILLE except for the TV tag.
! The reason is that máhttát takes acc objects, but does not have passive.




! Substems for contracted verbs
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON BASSO-MUITAL
 MUITALINCH ;
 DeverbalNounsC ;

LEXICON DOHPPEStem
 :»j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJTV ;
 DeverbalNounsDOHPPE- ;

LEXICON GARREStem
 :»j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJTV ;
 DeverbalNounsGARRE- ;


LEXICON CIRROStem
 :»j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJ ;
 DeverbalNounsCIRRO- ;

LEXICON ORROStem
 :»j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJ ;
 DeverbalNounsORRO- ;


LEXICON CIRROStemTV
 :»j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJTV ;
 DeverbalNounsCIRROTV- ;


LEXICON DOHPPEINCH
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:»goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj ; ! Der/goah0ti changed to Der/goahti, as 0 is bad in tag
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:»šgoah'ti%> BOAHTICnj ; ! ditto
 DOHPPECnj ;

LEXICON DOHPPECnj
 :j jStemsDOHPPE ;
 :Y5 VStemsDOHPPE ;
 :Y6 VjStemsDOHPPE ;
!removed "+Der/j" in front of ":»j"



LEXICON VStemsDOHPPE
 +Ind+Prs: VSufDOHPPE ;
 +Cond: CondV2 ;
 +Pot+Prs:ž PotC ;
 +Imprt: ImprtSg2 ; !Prs
 NominalFormsVC ;

LEXICON CondV2
 +Prs:š CondBOAHTI ;
 +Prs+Use/NG:l CondBOAHTI ;


LEXICON VjStemsDOHPPE
 +Ind+Prt: PrtV1 ;

LEXICON jStemsDOHPPEpass
 +Ind: CSufDOHPPE ;
 
LEXICON jStemsDOHPPE
 +Ind: CSufDOHPPE ;
 ImprtC2 ;
! +Err/Orth: NominalFormsC2 ; L2

LEXICON VSufDOHPPE
 PrsV1 ;
 PrsV2 ;
 PrsV4 ;
 PrsV5 ;

LEXICON CSufDOHPPE
 +Prs: PrsC1 ;
 +Prt: PrtC3 ;



!! !!Basic lexica for trisyllabic verbs
! ----------------------------------

LEXICON COASKKIT_IV   !!= * __@CODE@__  Trisyllabic impersonals
 COASKKITCnj ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsCOASKKIT ;
