src/morphology/stems/verbs-L2.lexc
LEXICON Verb
akkederet+OLang/NOB:akkedere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
akkorderet+OLang/NOB:akkordere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN NOR
angliseret+OLang/NOB:anglisere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN NOR
apokoperet+OLang/NOB:apokopere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
arreteret+OLang/NOB:arretere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
arvvistit:arvvist COASKKIT_IV ;
aškkastit:aškkast COASKKIT_IV ;
balkaniseret+OLang/NOB:balkanisere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
biekkastit:biekkast COASKKIT_IV ;
bierfát:bierfá CIRRO_IV ;
biipet:bijpe GILLE_IV ;
bivaldit:bivald COASKKIT_IV ;
bivvát:bivvá CIRRO_IV ;
blogget+OLang/NOB:blogge DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
bolastit:bolast COASKKIT_IV ;
bollát:bollá CIRRO_IV ;
buddet:budde DOHPPE_TV ;
buiját:bujjá CIRRO_IV ;
buohccát:buohccá CIRRO_IV ;
buolaštit:buolašt COASKKIT_IV ;
busket:buske GILLE_IV ;
caggát:caggá CIRRO_IV ;
cirkát:cirká CIRRO_IV ;
cuoŋudit:cuoŋud COASKKIT_IV ;
davrát:davrá CIRRO_IV ;
defileret+OLang/NOB:defilere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
dekanteret+OLang/NOB:dekantere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
desorganiseret+OLang/NOB:des^organisere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
dihppet:dihppe GILLE_IV ;
distingveret+OLang/NOB:distingvere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
doardnát:doardná CIRRO_IV ;
dohkket:dohkke GILLE_IV ;
dovdát:dovdá MUITA_TV ;
dumpet:dumpe GILLE_IV ;
durdát:durdá CIRRO_IV ;
dálvvadit:dálvvad COASKKIT_IV ;
dálvádit:dálvád COASKKIT_IV ;
dáteret+OLang/NOB:dátere DOHPPE_TV ;
ekselleret+OLang/NOB:eksellere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN  NOR
erret:erre DOHPPE_TV ;
eskaleret+OLang/NOB:eskalere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
fagŋát:fagŋá CIRRO_IV ;
fallet:falle GILLE_IV ;
festet:feste GILLE_IV ;
fidnet:fidne DOHPPE_TV ;
fierttudit:fierttud COASKKIT_IV ;
firtestit:firtest COASKKIT_IV ;
fluoresceret+OLang/NOB:fluorescere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
furket:furke DOHPPE_TV ;
fáddet:fádde GILLE_IV ;
gaifát:gajfá MUITA_TV ;
galmmestit:galmme7st COASKKIT_IV ;
garcát:garcá CIRRO_IV ;
garret:garre GARRE_TV ;
gaškát:gašká CIRRO_IV ;
gehlát:gehlá CIRRO_IV ;
gestikuleret+OLang/NOB:gestikulere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
goalkkidit:goalkkid COASKKIT_IV ;
goarját:goarjá CIRRO_IV ;
gobmidit:gobmid COASKKIT_IV ;
goiget:gojge GILLE_IV ;
goiket:gojke DOHPPE_TV ;
golkestit:golkest COASKKIT_IV ;
graviteret+OLang/NOB:gravitere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
gullát:gullá MUITA_TV ;
guolddustit:guolddust COASKKIT_IV ;
guostát:guostá CIRRO_IV ;
gáludit:gálud COASKKIT_IV ;
gárgát:gárgá CIRRO_IV ;
harseleret+OLang/NOB:harselere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
heidnet:heidne DOHPPE_TV ;
hieimmastit:hiejmmast COASKKIT_IV ;
hirrát:hirrá CIRRO_IV ;
háhccet:háhcce GILLE_IV ;
impregneret+OLang/NOB:im^pre^gnere DOHPPE_TV ;
inflammeret+OLang/NOB:in^flammere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
introduceret+OLang/SWE:introducere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^
janzát:janzá CIRRO_IV ;
jielastit:jielast COASKKIT_IV ;
jálddudit:jálddud COASKKIT_IV ;
karteret+OLang/NOB:kartere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
koaguleret+OLang/NOB:ko^agulere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
komposteret+OLang/NOB:kompostere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
kontribueret+OLang/NOB:kon^tribu^ere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
krystalliseret+OLang/NOB:krystallisere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN NOR
kveruleret+OLang/NOB:kverulere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
leabbát:leabbá CIRRO_IV ;
liehmudit:liehmud COASKKIT_IV ;
limpet:limpe DOHPPE_TV ;
loahkehit:loahke7h COASKKIT_IV ;
loavskát:loavská CIRRO_IV ;
loget:loge GARRE_TV ;
lovppet:lovppe GILLE_IV ;
manikyreret+OLang/NOB:manikyrere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
menstrueret+OLang/NOB:menstru^ere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
mierkkádit:mierkkád COASKKIT_IV ;
moskkudit:moskkud COASKKIT_IV ;
moveret+OLang/NOB:movere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
mošoneret+OLang/NOB:mošonere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
muitát:mujtá MUITA_TV ;
muohtestit:muohte7st COASKKIT_IV ;
murkkudit:murkkud COASKKIT_IV ;
muŋkát:muŋká CIRRO_IV ;
máhttát:máhttá MAHTA_TV ;
nirvet:nirve GILLE_IV ;
njalsát:njalsá CIRRO_IV ;
njolvát:njolvá CIRRO_IV ;
njázudit:njázud COASKKIT_IV ;
normaliseret+OLang/NOB:normalisere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
nálset:nálse GILLE_IV ;
obbát:obbá CIRRO_IV ;
oktedit:okted COASKKIT_IV ;
oktestit:oktest COASKKIT_IV ;
orrot:orro ORRO_IV ;
ovet:ove GILLE_IV ;
paralyseret+OLang/NOB:paralysere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
participeret+OLang/NOB:participere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN  SW
polymeriseret+OLang/NOB:polymerisere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
prenumereret+OLang/NOB:prenumerere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
promoveret+OLang/NOB:promovere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
reageret+OLang/NOB:re^agere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
realsát:realsá CIRRO_IV ;
reflekteret+OLang/NOB:re^flektere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
reproduceret+OLang/SWE:re^producere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^
revolteret+OLang/NOB:revoltere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
roaibát:roajbá CIRRO_IV ;
rošket:roške DOHPPE_TV ;
rulljet:rullje GILLE_IV ;
ruodnát:ruodná CIRRO_IV ;
ruvaštit:ruvašt COASKKIT_IV ;
ránčát:ránčá CIRRO_IV ;
rášudit:rášud COASKKIT_IV ;
ráššudit:ráššud COASKKIT_IV ;
savddastit:savddast COASKKIT_IV ;
segregeret+OLang/NOB:se^gregere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
sirkuleret+OLang/NOB:sirkulere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN NOR
skielgát:skielgá CIRRO_IV ;
skjeletteret+OLang/NOB:skjelettere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN NOR
skuodnját:skuodnjá CIRRO_IV ;
snarrot:snarro CIRRO_IV ;
snuittet:snujtte GILLE_IV ;
solidariseret+OLang/NOB:solidarisere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
spálčát:spálčá CIRRO_IV ;
stagneret+OLang/NOB:stagnere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
stereotyperet+OLang/NOB:stereo#typere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
stumpát:stumpá CIRRO_IV ;
superet+OLang/NOB:supere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
surfet:surfe GILLE_IV ;
tiidet:tijde DOHPPE_TV ;
táhket:táhke GILLE_IV ;
táŋket:táŋke DOHPPE_TV ;
vagŋát:vagŋá CIRRO_IV ;
vierttudit:vierttud COASKKIT_IV ;
vuoddját:vuoddjá CIRRO_IV ;
vuohttát:vuohttá DOHPPE_TV ;
vuoissadit:vuojssad COASKKIT_IV ;
vuoissádit:vuojssád COASKKIT_IV ;
vuordát:vuordá MUITA_TV ;
čearsát:čearsá CIRRO_IV ;
čerget:čerge GILLE_IV ;
šikaneret+Err/Sub+OLang/NOB:sjikanere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN NOR
šlahttádit:šlahttád COASKKIT_IV ;
šlieddát+Err/Sub:šlieđđá CIRRO_IV ;
šnjuoggát:šnjuoggá CIRRO_IV ;
čoasihit:čoasih COASKKIT_IV ;
čuorpmastit:čuorpmast COASKKIT_IV ;
čuođđát:čuođđá CIRRO_IV ;
njurjet:njurje GILLE_IV ;
